District of Columbia statutes.
8-1031.06

Collector registration.

(a)

A collector shall register with the Office of Waste Diversion before operating in the District in accordance with this section.

(b)

The Office of Waste Diversion shall issue registrations annually for collectors and vehicles engaged in the collection and transportation of solid waste in the District. No collector registration shall be issued unless a collector:

(1)

Certifies that recyclable or compostable materials source separated as required by this chapter shall be delivered to a recycling or composting facility, as appropriate;

(2)

Provides a list of all vehicles used to collect solid waste in the District, including any information the Office of Waste Diversion requires about the vehicles; and

(3)

Beginning on October 1, 2016, has submitted the annual report required under § 8-1031.05(b) for the previous year.

(c)

The Mayor may establish separate registration procedures or requirements for collectors and vehicles based upon the type of solid waste collected or transported.

(d)

The Mayor shall establish registration fees to offset the costs of administering this chapter.

History

Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-154, § 106, 61 DCR 9971